Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 1. Taxes

§ 1521.
Tax bills and warrants.

The selectboard shall seasonably make out and deliver to the proper collector, or to the town treasurer, if the town has voted to collect its taxes by that officer, tax bills for State, county, town, town school district, and highway taxes, with the name of each person taxed and the amount of the tax. They shall annex proper warrants thereto for collection and may include all of such taxes or a part thereof in one tax bill; provided, however, that a tax bill that includes an assessment of tax on a homestead shall separately state the amount of tax imposed on the housesite for municipal services and the amount of tax imposed on the housesite for education property tax. One warrant only shall be required for the collection of taxes on such tax bill. The selectboard shall certify on a tax bill, so made out what taxes are included therein and the rate percent of each tax so included.

HISTORY:

Amended

1997, No. 60

, § 28, eff. July 1, 1998;

2003, No. 76

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. Feb. 17, 2004.

§ 1522.
Receipt for tax bills.

Upon the delivery of such tax bills to the collector, the selectboard shall take from him or her a receipt therefor, and shall deliver the same to the town treasurer.

§ 1523.
Tax bills; duties of selectboards as to a deficit.

When a town at the end of the fiscal year contemplated by section 1683 of this title has a deficit, unless the voters of said town have voted a special tax to make up said deficit or unless said deficit shall have been refunded pursuant to the provisions of chapter 53 of this title, the selectboard, when making up the next annual tax bill, shall add thereto a tax of five percent or such multiple of five in addition to the tax vote already authorized by law, to be levied upon the grand list of such town as will provide sufficient revenue to liquidate such deficit.

When a school district at the end of the fiscal year contemplated by section 1683 of this title has a deficit, unless the voters have voted to borrow funds to repay the deficit over a term of three years or less, or unless the deficit has been refunded pursuant to chapter 53 of this title, the school board shall add an amount sufficient to pay the deficit to its next adopted budget and report the total to the Secretary of Education for purposes of calculating education spending.

As used in this section, the following words have the following meanings unless the context clearly indicates the contrary: A “deficit” is the excess of the current liabilities and liability reserves of the fund over its current assets; or, where the fund has also other resources and obligations, the excess of its obligations over its resources; “current assets” are those assets which are available or can be made readily available to meet the cost of operations or to pay current liabilities; “current liabilities” are those liabilities which are payable within a relatively short period of time, usually no longer than a year; a “fund” is a sum of money or other resource set aside for the purpose of carrying on specific activities or attaining certain objectives in accordance with special regulations, restrictions, or limitations, and constituting an independent fiscal and accounting entity such as the general or school fund.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 129

, eff. April 21, 1959;

1997, No. 71

(Adj. Sess.), § 119, eff. March 11, 1998; amended

2003, No. 36

, § 11;

2005, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 270, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 1524.
Tax levies; how kept.

The town treasurer upon receiving from the selectboard a town tax bill under the provisions of

32 V.S.A. § 4791

or the receipt of the tax collector for such bill under the provisions of section 1522 of this title shall credit the town highway department and the town school district each with the gross sum of the levy provided for such department and district. The balance of such levy shall be credited to the general fund.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 74

, § 79.

§ 1525.
Tax levies; credit for gains.

The treasurer shall thereafter credit to the general fund all gains over the total sum of such rate bill by reason of fractional discounts under the provisions of

32 V.S.A. § 4774

or of interest charges upon delinquent tax payments under the provisions of

32 V.S.A. § 5136

or any other gain.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 74

, § 80.

§ 1526.
Tax levies; debit of general fund.

The treasurer shall debit thereafter such general fund with:

all collection fees allowed such treasurer for receiving taxes and issuing his or her warrant to the collector;

any other lawful costs of collection;

abatements made by the board for the abatement of taxes; and

any other diminution or loss in the course of the enforcement of such rate bill.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 74

, § 81.

§ 1527.
Tax levies—Officers’ duties.

In all towns having therein neither an incorporated village nor an incorporated school district, the town treasurer shall deal with the usual tax levies as provided in sections 1524-1526 of this title.

In any town having therein an incorporated village but no incorporated school district, the town treasurer shall deal with the usual tax levies except the highway levy as provided in such sections and the voters of the town may vote to adopt the provisions of the aforementioned sections for application to the town highway levy.

In any town having therein an incorporated school district but no incorporated village, the town treasurer shall deal with the usual tax levies except the school district levy as provided in sections 1524-1526 of this title and the voters of the town may vote to adopt the provisions of the aforementioned sections for application to the town school district levy.

In any town having therein both an incorporated school district and an incorporated village, the provisions of said sections 1524-1526 with regard to the relation of general fund, highway account, and town school district account shall apply only if adopted by action of the voters of the town.

§ 1528.
Collector of taxes.

When a town at its annual meeting elects a collector of taxes, he or she shall collect State, county, town, and town school district taxes.
Warrants and rate bills for the collection of such taxes shall be directed to the collector, and he or she shall give his or her receipt therefor.
He or she shall collect and pay over such taxes agreeably to his or her warrant.

§ 1529.
First constable as collector.

The first constable shall be collector of State, county, town, and town school district taxes when a collector of taxes is not elected at the annual town meeting, and shall pay over the taxes collected agreeably to the warrants for their collection.

§ 1530.
Compensation.

If a municipality votes to pay a salary or other compensation for collecting taxes in lieu of fees and commissions, the latter shall be turned in to the municipal treasurer at least once a month.

HISTORY:

Amended

1997, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 28, eff. April 29, 1998;

2003, No. 100

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 1531.
Payment of money; inspection of tax book.

When requested by notice in writing signed by a majority of the selectboard, the collector of taxes shall pay to the town treasurer the money belonging to the town and the town school district collected by him or her. He or she shall submit his or her tax book and list to the treasurer for inspection and computation.
When he or she fails to do so for ten days, he or she shall be fined not more than $100.00.

§ 1532.
Settlement; disqualification for neglect.

Annually, on or before February 1, the collector shall pay over all monies collected by him or her to the treasuries to which they belong and settle his or her account with the treasurers.
When he or she refuses or neglects so to do, he or she shall be ineligible to reelection for the ensuing year.

§ 1533.
Town board for the abatement of taxes.

The board of civil authority, with the listers and the town treasurer, shall constitute a board for the abatement of town and property taxes and water and sewer charges.

The act of a majority of a quorum at a meeting shall be treated as the act of the board. This quorum requirement need not be met if the town treasurer, a majority of the listers, and a majority of the selectboard are present at the meeting.

HISTORY:

Amended

1999, No. 49

, § 82, eff. June 2, 1999;

2017, No. 74

, § 82;

2017, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 1534.
Meetings; how notified.

Meetings of such board shall be notified like meetings of the board of civil authority, except that at least one of the listers shall have personal notice of such meetings.

§ 1535.
Abatement.

The board may abate in whole or part taxes, water charges, sewer charges, interest, or collection fees, or any combination of those, other than those arising out of a corrected classification of homestead or nonhomestead property, accruing to the town in the following cases:

taxes or charges of persons who have died insolvent;

taxes or charges of persons who have moved from the State;

taxes or charges of persons who are unable to pay their taxes or charges, interest, and collection fees;

taxes in which there is manifest error or a mistake of the listers;

taxes or charges upon real or personal property lost or destroyed during the tax year;

the exemption amount available under

32 V.S.A. § 3802(11)

to persons otherwise eligible for exemption who file a claim on or after May 1 but before October 1 due to the claimant’s sickness or disability or other good cause as determined by the board of abatement; but that exemption amount shall be reduced by 20 percent of the total exemption for each month or portion of a month the claim is late filed;

, [Repealed.]

(9)

taxes or charges upon a mobile home moved from the town during the tax year as a result of a change in use of the mobile home park land or parts thereof or closure of the mobile home park in which the mobile home was sited, pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 6237

.

The board’s abatement of an amount of tax or charge shall automatically abate any uncollected interest and fees relating to that amount.

The board shall, in any case in which it abates taxes or charges, interest, or collection fees accruing to the town or denies an application for abatement, state in detail in writing the reasons for its decision.

The board may order that any abatement as to an amount or amounts already paid be in the form of a refund or in the form of a credit against the tax or charge for the next ensuing tax year or charge billing cycle and for succeeding tax years or billing cycles if required to use up the amount of the credit.
(d) (1) The board may order that any abatement as to an amount or amounts already paid be in the form of a refund or in the form of a credit against the tax or charge for the next ensuing tax year or charge billing cycle and for succeeding tax years or billing cycles if required to use up the amount of the credit.

Whenever a municipality votes to collect interest on overdue taxes pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 5136

, interest in a like amount shall be paid by the municipality to any person for whom an abatement has been ordered.

Interest on taxes or charges paid and subsequently abated shall accrue from the date payment was due or made, whichever is later. However, abatements issued pursuant to subdivision (a)(5) of this section need not include the payment of interest.

When a refund has been ordered, the board shall draw an order on the town treasurer for payment of the refund.

HISTORY:

Amended

1975, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1989, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 24, 1990;

1991, No. 19

;

1995, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1999, No. 49

, § 83, eff. June 2, 1999;

1999, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 24, eff. May 29, 2000;

2001, No. 140

(Adj. Sess.), § 30, eff. June 21, 2002;

2003, No. 76

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Feb. 17, 2004;

2005, No. 14

, §§ 6, 7, eff. May 3, 2005;

2011, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2017, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 1536.
Abatement; record; discharge.

The board for the abatement of taxes shall make a record of taxes, interest, and fees so abated, which shall be recorded in the office of the town clerk and a certified copy shall be forwarded forthwith to the collector of taxes and the town treasurer. The collector shall mark in the tax bill the taxes, interest, and fees abated and the persons against whom they were assessed shall be discharged from their payment. An abatement of a use change tax shall be separately recorded in the land records of the municipality in which the property subject to the abatement is located and shall effect a release of the land use lien on the portion of the property abated.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 24, 1990;

1999, No. 49

, § 84, eff. June 2, 1999;

2017, No. 74

, § 83.

§ 1537.
City or village board of tax abatement.

The board for the abatement of taxes of a city shall consist of the mayor, city clerk, and aldermen thereof and the justices of the peace and assessors residing therein; of a village, of the trustees and clerk thereof and the justices of the peace and listers residing therein.
Such board may abate taxes, interest, and fees accruing to such municipality in all cases where a different provision is not made by the charter, acts of incorporation, or amendments thereto, of such municipality.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 24, 1990.

§ 1538.
Assessment of tax to pay execution.

When a demand is made upon a city, town, town school district, or incorporated village for payment of an execution issued against it, and funds are not available in its treasury to pay the same, the mayor and board of aldermen, selectboard, or trustees shall forthwith assess a tax upon the grand list of the city, town, town school district, or incorporated village, sufficient to pay such execution with the charges and 12 percent interest thereon, and cause the same to be collected within 60 days.